District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.05a

Assessment Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Assessment Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department of Health Care Finance in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of revenue from the following sources:

(1)

User fees; and

(2)

Enrollment fees.

(c)

The Fund shall be used for the following purposes:

(1)

Administration and maintenance of the Department’s provider operations;

(2)

Enrollment activities; and

(3)

Health information exchange activities.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization by Congress, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 6a
as added Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5012, 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5012 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5012 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5011 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle B of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Health Care Finance Establishment Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.